Mississippi, session 2026, HB1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 29-5-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-5-2.  The duties of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be as follows: (a)  (i)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the following state property located in the City of Jackson:  the New State Capitol Building, the Woolfolk State Office Building and Parking Garage, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building, the Walter Sillers Office Building and Parking Garage, the War Veterans' Memorial Building, the Charlotte Capers Building, the William F. Winter Archives and History Building, the Mississippi Museum Complex, the Gulf, Mobile and Ohio Train Depot (GM&O Depot), the Old State Capitol Building, the Governor's Mansion, the Heber Ladner Building, the Robert E. Lee Office Building, the Robert E. Lee Parking Garage, the former Naval Reserve Center, 515 East Amite Street, 620 North Street, 660 North Street, 700 North State Street, 350 High Street, 401 North Lamar Street, 455 North Lamar Street, the State Records Center, the Robert G. Clark, Jr. Building, the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex, the former Central High Building, the Mississippi Workers' Compensation Commission Office Building, as well as all state-owned or leased buildings situated on seat of government property. (ii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the Dr. Eldon Langston Bolton Building located in Biloxi, Mississippi. (iii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the State Service Center, located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and John Merl Tatum Industrial Drive in Hattiesburg, Mississippi. (iv)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, including, but not limited to: 1.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Shared Services Center and Lockheed Martin Building at Stennis Space Center; 2.  The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame; 3.  The Mississippi Crafts Center; 4.  The Mississippi Children's Museum; and 5.  The Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Center. (b)  To assign suitable office space for the various state departments, officers and employees who are provided with an office in any of the buildings under the jurisdiction or control of the Department of Finance and Administration.  However, the assignment of space in the New Capitol Building shall be designated by duly passed resolution of the combined Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee, meeting as a joint committee, approved by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives.  A majority vote of the members of the Senate Rules Committee and a majority vote of the members of the House Management Committee shall be required on all actions taken, resolutions or reports adopted, and all other matters considered by the full combined committee on occasions when the Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee shall meet as a full combined committee. (c)  To approve or disapprove with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease or rental agreements by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration, including space necessary for parking to be used by state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building.  In no event shall any employee, officer, department, federally funded agency or bureau of the state be authorized to enter into a lease or rental agreement without prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Public Procurement Review Board. No agency may lease or occupy an area larger than required to provide two hundred fifty (250) square feet of office space per full-time salaried employee, contract worker, vendor, or person occupying space for more than twenty-four (24) hours per week.  By December 1 of each year, all state agencies in violation of the provisions of this section on the last day of the previous fiscal year shall submit to the Department of Finance and Administration a plan to become compliant with the provisions of this section. Any agency unable to comply with the provisions of this section by June 30, 2031, due to preexisting leases shall further explain current lease terms in writing to the Department of Finance and Administration by December 1, 2026.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall compile a list of agencies in violation of this provision as of the last day of the previous fiscal year and their respective compliance plan(s) and provide it to the Senate and House of Representatives by December 31 of each year. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to use architects, engineers, building inspectors and other personnel for the purpose of making inspections as may be deemed necessary in carrying out its duties and maintaining the facilities. This section is not intended to apply to locations for which the Department of Finance and Administration has decided to solicit proposals in accordance with subsection (e) of this section. (d)  To acquire by lease, lease-purchase agreement, or otherwise, as provided in Section 27-104-107, and to assign through the Office of General Services, by lease or sublease agreement from the office, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, to any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, appropriate office space in the buildings acquired. (e)  To solicit and approve or disapprove, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease, use or rental agreement for a charge or other consideration for space not exceeding three thousand (3,000) square feet in any individual building listed in subsection (a) of this section, with a private entry who will provide food and/or catering services for state employees, visitors and the general public. The department shall select the entity using a competitive process which shall be publicly advertised.  In addition to satisfying any other requirements for the Public Procurement Review Board's approval, the department must demonstrate that any agreement entered into under this section will neither result in a net cost to the state, nor impair or impede the function of state agencies at such location. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.